src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/mrj-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - толаш: # Verb1 'to come'
     толаш+V+Inf: толаш
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: толам
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: толат
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: толеш
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: толынӓ
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: толылӓ
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: толыт
